Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-514
Act, how cited.

Sections 3-501 to 3-514 shall be known and may be cited as the Cities Airport Authorities Act.

Laws 1957, c. 9, § 17, p. 126;

Laws 2002, LB 446, § 8.